Utah statutes.
16-16-117.   Designated office and agent for service of process.
(1)  A limited cooperative association, or a foreign cooperative that has a
certificate of authority under Section 16-16-1404, shall designate and
continuously maintain in this state:
(a)  an office, as its designated office, which need not be a place of the
association's or foreign cooperative's activity in this state; and
(b)  an agent for service of process at the designated office.
(2)  An agent for service of process of a limited cooperative association or
foreign cooperative must be an individual who is a resident of this state or
an entity that is authorized to do business in this state.
